Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.026

Service of process, notice, or demand.

Service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the limited liability company may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7104; 2015 c 188 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.